District of Columbia statutes.
50-1501.31

Required records for sale of 5 or more motor vehicles in one year.

A person or auctioneer who sells or arranges the sale of 5 or more motor vehicles in one year in the District of Columbia shall record the name, address, and license number of the buyer, the vehicle identification number, and the identity of the original owner of the vehicle within 24 hours of purchase. This record shall be available to the Mayor and the Chief of Police. For the purposes of this section, the term “license” means a motor vehicle operator’s permit or commercial driver’s license.

June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 20, 58 DCR 1174

History